Nebraska, session 109, LB207.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 60-3,191, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
60-3,191 (1) In addition to any other fee required under the Motor Vehicle
Registration Act, a fee for registration of each motor vehicle powered by an
alternative fuel shall be charged. The fee shall be:
(a) For one hundred fifty dollars, except that for a motorcycle or plug-in
hybrid electric vehicle, the fee shall be seventy-five dollars; .
(b) For any commercially registered alternative fuel vehicle that is not
registered pursuant to section 60-3,198 and that has a gross weight of more
than seven thousand five hundred pounds, three times the applicable fee for
other motor vehicles powered by an alternative fuel as described in subdivision
(1)(c) of this section; or
(c) For any other motor vehicle powered by an alternative fuel, one
hundred fifty dollars.
(2) The fee shall be collected by the county treasurer and remitted to the
State Treasurer for credit to the Highway Trust Fund.
Sec. 2. Original section 60-3,191, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-1-